Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.413.060

Fundamental course of study.

(1) School districts must implement this section only in school years for which state funding is appropriated specifically for the purposes of this section and only for the number of days that are funded by the appropriation.

(2)(a) School districts must provide a four-day fundamental course of study on the state standards of practice, as defined by the board, to paraeducators who have not completed the course, either in the district or in another district within the state.

(b) School districts must use best efforts to provide the fundamental course of study before the paraeducator begins to work with students and their families, and at a minimum by the following deadlines:

(i) For paraeducators hired before the beginning of the school year, the first two days of the fundamental course of study must be provided in person before the beginning of the school year and the second two days of the fundamental course of study must be provided within six months of the date of hire; and

(ii) For paraeducators hired after the beginning of the school year:

(A) For paraeducators hired by first-class districts, the first two days of the fundamental course of study must be provided in person within four months of the date of hire and the second two days of the fundamental course of study must be provided within six months of the date of hire or by September 1st of the following year, whichever is sooner; and

(B) For paraeducators hired by second-class districts, the four-day fundamental course of study must be provided no later than September 1st of the following year, with two of the days provided in person unless the district has applied for and received an exemption under RCW 28A.413.065.

(3) School districts may collaborate with other school districts or educational service districts to meet the requirements of this section.

[ 2024 c 173 s 3; 2019 c 268 s 3; 2018 c 153 s 3; 2017 c 237 s 7.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—2024 c 173: See note following RCW 28A.413.065.